DI-686

DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

DIATQ-01

DTC | B1158/B1159/16 |Front Airbag Sensor LH Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The front airbag sensor LH circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and the front airbag sensor LH.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-3.
DTC B1158/B1159/16 is recorded when malfunction is detected in the front airbag sensor LH circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
* Front airbag sensor LH
* Airbag sensor assembly
B1158/B1159/16 | «Front airbag sensor LH malfunction *Dash wire
* Engine room No. 2 wire
* Engine room main wire
HINT:

DTC B1158/B1159/16 is indicated only for the vehicle equipped with the mechanical type front airbag sensor.

WIRING DIAGRAM

See page DI-628.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI-764).

-

2 [ Check front airbag sensor LH circuit.

PREPARATION:
Connect the connector to the front airbag sensor LH.
:l Airbag CHECK:
| o | 7 ] VS ,
I ! A:g:::bly Measuretheresistance between+SLand  -SL ofthe connector
: &] on the airbag sensor assembly side between the front airbag
g;onnsto'?'lr_?_'ag Airbag Sensor sensor LH and the airbag sensor assembly.
Assembly OK:

Resistance: 754 - 886 Q

NG> Go to step 7.

H21772
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3 | Check front airbag sensor LH circuit (to ground).

:l Airbag

(I sensor
{} :l Assembly

Front Airbag
Sensor LH Airbag Sensor
Assembly
(+)
)
163388 = H21773
OK

CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the body ground and each of
+SLand -SLofthe connectorontheairbagsensorassembly
side betweenthe frontairbag sensor LH andthe airbag sensor
assembly.
OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ2 or Higher

NGéﬂto step9.

4 | Check front airbag sensor LH circuit (to B+).

:l Airbag

[:m:ng % Sensor

Front Airbag .
Sensor LH Airbag Sensor
Assembly
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PREPARATION:

Connectthe negative ( -) terminal cabletothe battery, and wait

atleastfor2seconds.

CHECK:

(@  Turn the ignition switch to ON.

(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and each
of+SLand -SL ofthe connectoronthe aribagsensoras-
sembly side between the front airbag sensor LH and the
airbag sensor assembly.

OK:

Voltage: Below 1V

NGé&\tostep 11.
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5 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

Front Airbag
Sensor LH
:| Airbag
|: [I:i [D :l Sensor
:| Assembly

—_—

H21775

PREPARATION:

(@  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

() Connect the airbag sensor assembly connector.

(d) Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
(c) Turntheignition switchto LOCK, and waitatleastfor 10

seconds.

(d)  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

DTCB 1158/B1159/16 is not output.
HINT:
Codes other than DTC B1158/B1159/16 may be output at this
time, but they are not relevant to this check.

NG > Replace airbag sensor assembly.

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.
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6 | Check front airbag sensor LH.

«— —

PREPARATION:

] Airbag

Front Airbag
Sensor LH

H21557
H01062

:l Assembly

H21770

OK

Disconnectthe frontairbag sensor LH connector.
CHECK:
Measuretheresistancebetween+SLand  -SL ofthefrontair-
bag sensor LH.
OK:
Resistance: 754 - 886 Q2

NG F>+Iace frontairbag sensorLH.

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.

7 | Check engine room main wire.

Engine Room
Main Wire

Front - —>

H21555
H03360H09507

Airbag
Sensor D:m:[l ]Sensor

]Airbag

]Assembly

H21722

OK
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PREPARATION:
(@) Disconnect the engine room main wire connector on the
airbag sensor assembly side.
(b) Using aservice wire, connect +SL and -SLoftheengine
room main wire on the front airbag sensor LH side.
CHECK:
Measuretheresistance between+SLand  -SLoftheengine
room main wire connector on the airbag sensor assembly side.
OK:
Resistance: Below 1 Q

NG> Dair or replace engineroom main wire.
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8 [ Check engine room No. 2 wire.

Engine Room

No. 2 Wire Dash Wire
Zrob”; - - ]Airbag
Sensgr I: D:[l B:E ]Sensor
LH ]Assembly

g Y

+SL‘J L_SL +SL uu
1

-SL

()

H21554
H03360H16251 H21723

OK

PREPARATION:

(a) Disconnect the engine room No. 2 wire connector from
the dash wire.

(b) Using a service wire, connect +SL and —SL of the engine
room No. 2 wire on the engine room main wire side.

CHECK:

Measure the resistance between +SL and —SL of the engine

room No. 2 wire connector on the dash wire side.

OK:
Resistance: Below 1 Q

)

Repair or replace engine room No. 2 wire.

Repair or replace dash wire.

9 [ Check engine room main wire (to ground).

Engine Room

Main Wire
o] L Haibag
Sensgr I: D:[D:D ]Sensor
LH ]Assembly

H21724
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PREPARATION:
Disconnect the engine room main wire connector on the airbag
sensor assembly side.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the body ground and each of
+SL and —SL of the engine room main wire connector on the air-
bag sensor assembly side.
OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ or Higher

)

Repair or replace engine room main wire.
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10 | Check engine room No. 2 wire (to ground).

No. 2 Wire  Dash Wire Disconnect the engine room No. 2 wire connector from the dash
1 wire.
Aitbag =0 ]éirbag CHECK:
ff'nsor :| Agggr?:my Measure the resistance between the body ground and each of
M +SL and -SL of the engine room No. 2 wire connector on the
dash wire side.
OK:
— Resistance: 1 MQ or Higher
+SL Jloc=o|\ -SL
J H J
(-)@ ).
J_ N
H21552 1 = NG Repair or replace engine room No. 2 wire.
H16252 H21725
OK

Repair or replace dash wire.

11 | Check engine room main wire (to B+).

Engine Room PREPARATION:
Main Wire (@) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
—" . ]Airbag (b) Disconnect t.he negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
ggﬁzgr [ D:[D:D ]Sensor te.ry, and wait at Iea§t for 90 secgndg
LH ]Assemmy (©) leconnect the engine room main wire connector on the
airbag sensor assembly side.
M (d) Connecthe negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and

wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@) Turn the ignition switch to ON.

(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and each
of +SL and —SL of the engine room main wire connector
on the airbag sensor assembly side.

H03364 H21726 %

NG> Repair or replace engine room main wire.

Voltage: Below 1V
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12 | Check engine room No. 2 wire (to B+).

Engine Room PREPARATION:
No. 2 Wire  Dash Wire (&)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
—— ]Airba (b) Disconnect the negative (=) terminal cable from the bat-
Airbag e g tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
Sensor [ D:D Sensor . . .
o ]Assemmy (c) Dlsconnect. the engine room No. 2 wire connector from
M the dash wire.
(d) Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery,
ON and wait at least for 2 seconds.
@ == CHECK:
+SL | o5 -SL (@ Turn the ignition switch to ON.
J=E (b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and each
) (+)[ ] of +SL and —SL of the engine room No. 2 wire connector
l_@ on the dash wire side.
WB58 isosa T woirar| OK:
Voltage: Below 1V
NG> Repair or replace engine room No. 2 wire.
OK

Repair or replace dash wire.
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